District of Columbia statutes.
16-516

Attachment of money or property in hands of executor or administrator.

An attachment may be levied upon money or property of the defendant in the hands of an executor or administrator, and binds the same from the time of service. If the executor or administrator makes return to the writ that he can not certainly answer whether the defendant’s share of the money or property in his hands will prove sufficient to pay the plaintiff’s debt, a judgment of condemnation may not be rendered as against the executor or administrator until the passage by the Superior Court of his final or other account showing money or property in his hands to which the defendant is entitled.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 548, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 555, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(b)(2)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-516.
1973 Ed., § 16-516.